Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.080

Authority of secretary—Examination—Contents—Immunity.

(1) The secretary is hereby authorized and empowered to execute the provisions of this chapter and shall offer examinations in order to become a licensed acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner at least twice a year at such times and places as the secretary may select. The examination shall be a written examination and may include a practical examination.

(2) The secretary shall approve a licensure examination in the subjects that the secretary determines are within the scope of and commensurate with the work performed by an acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner and shall include but not necessarily be limited to anatomy, physiology, microbiology, biochemistry, pathology, hygiene, acupuncture, and Eastern medicine. All application papers shall be deposited with the secretary and there retained for at least one year, when they may be destroyed.

(3) If the examination is successfully passed, the secretary shall confer on such candidate the title of acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner.

[ 2019 c 308 s 7; 2010 c 286 s 6; 2009 c 560 s 2; 1995 c 323 s 7; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 502; 1992 c 110 s 3; 1991 c 3 s 10; 1985 c 326 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 308: See note following RCW 18.06.010.

Intent—2009 c 560: "One of the key roles of advisory boards, committees, and commissions is to provide input, advice and recommendations from stakeholders, other interested parties, and the public to state agencies. Some advisory boards, committees, and commissions may be abolished without detriment to the mission of the agency each supports. Most of the advisory functions of some boards, committees, and commissions can be performed without the administrative costs of maintaining formal organizations. In the interest of building a leaner, more efficient, and more responsible government, this vital communications conduit must be maintained for the benefit of the state and its citizens, through the use of modern communication technology. It is the intent of the legislature this interim to identify criteria to evaluate those advisory boards, committees, and commissions that may be eliminated or consolidated, and for agencies to identify new, less costly, and more effective opportunities to ensure a broad range of citizen participation is provided and that all reasonable efforts are made to ensure that channels are maintained for vital input from the citizens of Washington." [ 2009 c 560 s 1.]

Effective date—2009 c 560: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 30, 2009." [ 2009 c 560 s 30.]

Disposition of property and funds—Assignment/delegation of contractual rights or duties—2009 c 560: "(1) All documents and papers, equipment, or other tangible property in the possession of the terminated entity shall be delivered to the custody of the entity assuming the responsibilities of the terminated entity or if such responsibilities have been eliminated, documents and papers shall be delivered to the state archivist and equipment or other tangible property to the *department of general administration.

(2) All funds held by, or other moneys due to, the terminated entity shall revert to the fund from which they were appropriated, or if that fund is abolished to the general fund.

(3) All contractual rights and duties of an entity shall be assigned or delegated to the entity assuming the responsibilities of the terminated entity, or if there is none to such entity as the governor shall direct." [ 2009 c 560 s 28.]

*Reviser's note: The department of general administration was renamed the department of enterprise services by 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 107.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.